Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 32.5. Solar Easements

38-32.5-100.3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Solar easement” means the right of receiving sunlight across real property for any solar energy device. Such a right may be stated in any deed, will, or other instrument executed by or on behalf of any owner of land or sky space.

“Solar energy device” means a solar collector or other device or a structural design feature of a structure which provides for the collection of sunlight and which comprises part of a system for the conversion of the sun’s radiant energy into thermal, chemical, mechanical, or electrical energy.

History.

Source:
L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1395, § 1, effective May 25.

38-32.5-101.
Solar easements - creation.

Any easement obtained for the purpose of exposure of a solar energy device shall be created in writing and shall be subject to the same conveyancing and instrument recording requirements as other easements; except that a solar easement shall not be acquired by prescription.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 1430, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1395, § 2, effective May 25.

38-32.5-102.
Contents.

Any instrument creating a solar easement shall include, but the contents shall not be limited to:

A description of the vertical and horizontal angles, expressed in degrees together with any pertinent hourly, diurnal, or seasonal variations thereof, and measured from the site of the solar energy device, within which the solar easement extends over the real property subject to the solar easement, or any other description which defines the three-dimensional space or the place and time of day in which an obstruction to direct sunlight is prohibited or limited;

Any terms or conditions or both under which the solar easement is granted or will be terminated;

Any provisions for compensation of the owner of the property benefiting from the solar easement in the event of interference with the enjoyment of the solar easement or compensation of the owner of the property subject to the solar easement for maintaining the solar easement;

The restrictions placed upon vegetation, structures, and other objects which would impair or obstruct the passage of sunlight through the easement.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 1430, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 79:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(d) added, p. 1396, § 3, effective May 25.

38-32.5-103.
Enforcement.

In addition to other legal remedies, injunctive relief may be available if otherwise appropriate for the enforcement of solar easements. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect legal remedies for the enforcement of other types of easements.

History.

Source:
L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1395, § 1, effective May 25.